Tennessee, session 114, HB1681.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-804, is amended by deleting the
second sentence and substituting:
This part does not affect the operation and effect of chapters 32 and 33 of this title, and
parts 1-7 of this chapter, which continue in full force and effect as separate and
independent authority for the establishment and governance of a central business
improvement or infrastructure development district.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-811, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a) Upon the filing of an initiating petition, each governing body of a host
municipality required to receive filing of such petition must order a public hearing by the
governing body to determine whether the infrastructure development district will be
established.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-811, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), when a district must be approved by two (2)
or more host municipalities, the governing bodies may hold one (1) or more joint public
hearings, or the governing bodies may hold separate public hearings when a governing
body makes approval contingent on the approval of another governing body.
HB1681
010666
- 1 -

SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-814, is amended by deleting
subdivision (7) and substituting:
(7) The maximum rate of levy of the special assessment that may be imposed;
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-815, is amended by deleting
subsection (d) and substituting:
(d) The maximum term of any bonds, notes, or other debt obligations issued
pursuant to this section to fund the costs of infrastructure, including any refinancing
bonds, must not exceed thirty (30) years from the first issuance of bonds, notes, or other
debt obligations for the purpose of funding infrastructure. For development projects with
multiple phases of development, bonds may be issued for each phase of the
development and each phase must not exceed thirty (30) years from date of issuance of
the bonds for that phase.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-817, is amended by deleting
subsection (f) and substituting:
(f) Notwithstanding this part to the contrary, an establishment resolution may
provide that a portion of special assessments be set aside for the actual cost of
administrative expenses, including expenses incurred by the host municipality and the
officers of the municipality, including the assessor of property, trustee, or other tax
collecting official, in administering the collection and allocation of special assessments,
including a reasonable allocation of overhead expenses.
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-84-827, is amended by deleting the
language:
Each district established pursuant to this part must be dissolved by the governing
bodies of the host municipality, no later than thirty (30) years from the date the district is
established, or if earlier, immediately upon:
- 2 - 010666

and substituting:
Each district established pursuant to this part must be dissolved by the governing
bodies of the host municipality no later than thirty (30) years from the date that the last
assessment is first levied, or if earlier, immediately upon:
SECTION 8. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 010666